California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) “Member” means any person who, pursuant to a specific provision of a corporation’s articles or bylaws, has the right to vote for the election of a director or directors, or possesses proprietary interests in the corporation.

(b) The articles or bylaws may confer some or all of the rights of a member, set forth in this part, upon any person or persons who do not have any of the voting rights referred to in subdivision (a).

(c) Where a member of a corporation is not a natural person, such member may authorize in writing one or more natural persons to vote on its behalf on any or all matters which may require a vote of
 the members.

(d) A person is not a member by virtue of any of the following:

(1) Any rights such person has as a delegate.

(2) Any rights such person has to designate or select a director or directors.

(3) Any rights such person has as a director.

(e) “Worker-member” means a member of a worker cooperative who is a natural person and also a patron of a worker cooperative.

(f) “Community investor” means a person who is not a worker-member and who holds a share or other proprietary interest in a worker cooperative.

(g) “Worker” means a natural person contributing
 labor or services to a worker cooperative. “Candidate” means a worker who is being considered for membership in a worker cooperative, as defined in the corporation’s articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 7.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12239.

A “membership” refers to the rights a member has pursuant to a corporation’s articles, bylaws and this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12240.

“Membership certificate,” as used in this part, means a document evidencing a proprietary interest in a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12241.

“Officers’ certificate” means a certificate signed and verified by the chair of the board, the president, or any vice president, and by the secretary, the chief financial officer, the treasurer, or any assistant secretary or assistant treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 39.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12242.

“On the certificate,” as used in this part means that a statement appears on the face of a certificate or on the reverse thereof with a reference thereto on the face.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12242.5.

“Other business entity” means a domestic or foreign limited liability company, limited partnership, general partnership, business trust, real estate investment trust, unincorporated association, or a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance as set forth in Article 16 (commencing with Section 1550) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code. As used herein, “general partnership” means a “partnership” as defined in Section 16101; “business trust” means a business organization formed as a trust; “real estate investment trust” means a “real estate investment trust” as defined in subsection (a) of Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and “unincorporated association” has the meaning
 set forth in Section 18035.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 361, Sec. 8.   (AB 1862)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12242.6.

“Parent party” means the corporation in control of any constituent domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity and whose equity securities are issued, transferred, or exchanged in a merger pursuant to Section 12540.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 23.7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12243.

(a) (1) If the corporation is organized to provide goods or services to its members, the corporation’s “patrons” are those who purchase those types of goods from, or use those types of services of, the corporation. If the corporation is organized to market, process, or otherwise handle its members’ products or services, the corporation’s “patrons” are those persons whose products or services are so marketed, processed, or handled by the corporation.

(2) “Patronage” of a patron is measured by the volume or value, or both, of a patron’s purchases of products from, and use of services furnished by, the corporation, and by products and services provided by the
 patron to the corporation for marketing.

(b) (1) If the corporation is organized as a worker cooperative, the corporation’s “patrons” are its worker-members.

(2) If the corporation is organized as a worker cooperative, “patronage” may be measured by work performed, including, but not limited to, wages earned, number of hours worked, number of jobs created, or some combination of these measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 8.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12244.

“Patronage distribution” means any transfer made to a patron of the corporation the amount of which is computed with reference to the patron’s patronage of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12245.

“Person,” unless otherwise expressly provided, includes any association, company, domestic or foreign corporation, corporation sole, estate, individual, joint stock company, joint venture, partnership, domestic or foreign limited liability company, government or political subdivision, agency or instrumentality of a government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12245.2.

“Preferred memberships” means memberships that have a preference over any other memberships with respect to distribution of assets on liquidation or with respect to payment of distributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12246.

“Proper county” means the county where the corporation’s principal office in this state is located or, if the corporation has no such office, the County of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12246.2.

“Series” of memberships means memberships within a class of memberships that have the same rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, and conditions, but that differ in one or more rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions from other memberships within the class. Certificated securities and uncertificated securities do not constitute a different series if the only difference is certificated and uncertificated status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12247.

“Shareholder” shall have the same meaning as “member” as defined in Section 12238.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12248.

“Share certificate” shall have the same meaning as “membership certificate” as defined in Section 12240.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12249.

“Surviving corporation” means a corporation into which one or more other corporations are merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12250.

“Vacancy” when used with respect to the board means any authorized position of director which is not then filled, whether the vacancy is caused by death, resignation, removal, change in the number of directors authorized in the articles or bylaws (by the board or the members), or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

“Verified” means that the statements contained in a certificate or other document are declared to be true of the own knowledge of the persons executing the same in either:

(a) An affidavit signed by them under oath before an officer authorized by the laws of this state or of the place where it is executed to administer oaths; or 

(b) A declaration in writing executed by them under penalty of perjury and stating the date and place (whether within or without this state) of execution.

Any
 affidavit sworn to without this state before a notary public or a judge or clerk of a court of record having an official seal need not be further authenticated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

“Vote” includes, but is not limited to, authorization by written consent pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12351 and authorization by written ballot pursuant to Section 12463.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12253.

(a) “Voting power” means the power to vote for the election of directors at the time any determination of voting power is made and does not include the right to vote upon the happening of some condition or event that has not yet occurred. 

(b) If different classes of memberships are entitled to vote as separate classes for different members of the board, the determination of percentage of voting power shall be made on the basis of the percentage of the total number of authorized directors that the memberships in question (whether of one or more classes) have the power to elect in an election at which all memberships then entitled to vote for the election of any directors are
 voted.

(c) Community investor voting power in a worker cooperative shall be provided in the articles or bylaws, and is limited to approval rights only over a merger, sale of major assets, reorganization, or dissolution. Approval rights shall not include the right to propose any action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 9.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12253.5.

“Worker cooperative” or “employment cooperative” means a corporation formed under this part that includes a class of worker-members who are natural persons whose patronage consists of labor contributed to or other work performed for the corporation. Election to be organized as a worker cooperative or an employment cooperative does not create a presumption that workers are employees of the corporation for any purposes. At least 51 percent of the workers shall be worker-members or candidates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 10.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12254.

“Written” or “in writing” includes facsimile, telegraphic, and other electronic communication as authorized by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12255.

“Written ballot” does not include a ballot distributed at a special or regular meeting of members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12256.

A central organization is a corporation whose membership is composed, in whole or in part, of other corporations organized under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Formation [12300. - 12302.1.]

12300.

(a) One or more persons may form a corporation under this part by executing and filing articles of incorporation.

(b) Where initial directors are named in the articles, each director named in the articles shall sign and acknowledge the articles. Where initial directors are not named in the articles, the articles shall be signed by a person or persons described in subdivision (a) who thereupon are the incorporators of the corporation.

(c) The corporate existence begins upon the filing of the articles and continues perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law or in the articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

12301.

(a) In the case of an existing unincorporated association, the association may change its status to that of a corporation upon a proper authorization for such by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(b) In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the articles pursuant to Section 12310, the articles in the case of an incorporation authorized by subdivision (a) shall set forth that an existing unincorporated association, stating its name, is being incorporated by the filing of the articles.

(c) The articles filed pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a verified statement of any two officers or governing board members of the association stating that the incorporation of the association by means of the articles to which the verified statement is attached has been approved by the association in accordance with its rules and procedures.

(d) Upon the change of status of an unincorporated association to a corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the property of the association becomes the property of the corporation and the members of the association who have any voting rights of the type referred to in Section 12238 become members of the corporation. 

(e) The filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the association is located, of a copy of the articles of incorporation filed pursuant to this section, certified by the Secretary of State, shall evidence record ownership in the corporation of all interests of the association in and to the real property located in that county.

(f) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of the association shall be preserved unimpaired. Any action or proceeding pending by or against the unincorporated association may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the corporation, or the corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(g) If a corporation is organized by a person who is or was an officer, director or member of an unincorporated association and such corporation is not organized pursuant to subdivision (a), the unincorporated association may continue to use its name and the corporation may not use a name which is the same as or similar to the name of the unincorporated association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not file articles setting forth a name in which “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” or related words appear, unless the certificate of approval of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation is attached thereto.

(b) The name of a corporation shall not be a name that the Secretary of State determines is likely to mislead the public and shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from all of the following:

(1) The name of any corporation.

(2) The name of any foreign corporation authorized to transact
 intrastate business in this state.

(3) Each name that is under reservation pursuant to this title.

(4) The name of a foreign corporation that has registered its name pursuant to Section 2101.

(5) An alternate name of a foreign corporation under subdivision (b) of Section 2106.

(6) A name that will become the record name of a domestic or foreign corporation upon a corporate instrument when there is a delayed effective or file date.

(c) The use by a corporation of a name in violation of this section may be enjoined notwithstanding the filing of its articles by the Secretary of State.

(d) Any applicant may, upon payment of the fee prescribed therefor in the Government Code, obtain from the Secretary of State a certificate of reservation of any name not prohibited by subdivision (b), and upon the issuance of the certificate the name stated therein shall be reserved for a period of 60 days. The Secretary of State shall not, however, issue certificates reserving the same name for two or more consecutive 60-day periods to the same applicant or for the use or benefit of the same person; nor shall consecutive reservations be made by or for the use or benefit of the same person of names so similar as to fall within the prohibitions of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 75.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12302.1.

The Secretary of State shall not file articles for a corporation the name of which would fall within the prohibitions of Section 18104 of the Financial Code. This section shall not apply to articles filed for a corporation organized in accordance with Section 18100 of the Financial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 453, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Articles of Incorporation [12310. - 12317.]

12310.

The articles of incorporation of a corporation formed under this part shall set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation.

(b) The following statement:
“This corporation is a cooperative corporation organized under the Cooperative Corporation Law. The purpose of this corporation is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which a corporation may be organized under the law.”

[The articles may include a further description of the corporation’s purpose.]
(c) The name and street address in this state of the corporation’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 12570.

(d) The initial street address of the corporation.

(e) The initial mailing address of the corporation, if different from the initial street address.

(f) Whether the voting power or the proprietary interests of the members are equal or unequal. If the voting power or proprietary interests of the members are unequal, the articles shall state either (i) the general rule or rules by which the voting power and proprietary interests of the members shall be determined or (ii) that such rule or rules shall be prescribed in the corporation’s bylaws. Equal voting power means voting power apportioned on the basis of one vote for each member. Equal proprietary
 rights means property rights apportioned on the basis of one proprietary unit for each member.

(g) Pursuant to Section 12310.5, the articles of incorporation may state whether the cooperative has elected to be governed as a worker cooperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 11.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12310.5.

(a) A corporation organized under this part may elect to be governed as a worker cooperative by making the following statement in its articles of incorporation or its amended articles of incorporation:

“This corporation is a worker cooperative corporation organized under the Cooperative Corporation Law.”

(b) A corporation that makes the election to be governed as a worker cooperative, unless expressly exempted, shall be governed by all the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 192, Sec. 12.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12311.

(a) The names of all corporations formed under this part shall include “cooperative.” No corporation shall be formed under this part unless there is affixed or prefixed to its name some word or abbreviation which will indicate that it is a corporation, as distinguished from a natural person, a firm, or an unincorporated association.

(b) No person shall adopt or use the word “cooperative” or any abbreviation or derivation thereof, or any word similar thereto, as part of the name or designation under which it does business in this state, unless incorporated as provided in this part or unless incorporated as a nonprofit cooperative association under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section
 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code, as a stock cooperative, as defined in Section 11003.2 of the Business and Professions Code, as a limited-equity housing cooperative, as defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code, as a credit union or organization owned for the mutual benefit of credit unions, or under some other law of this state enabling it to do so. However, the foregoing prohibition shall be inapplicable to any credit union or organization owned for the mutual benefit of credit unions, any housing cooperative, the financing of which is insured, guaranteed, or provided, in whole or in part, by a public or statutorily chartered entity pursuant to a program created for housing cooperatives, a nonprofit corporation, a majority of whose membership is composed of cooperative corporations, or an academic institution that serves cooperative corporations.

(c) A domestic or foreign corporation or association which did business in
 this state under a name or designation including the word “cooperative” prior to September 19, 1939, and which conducts business on a cooperative basis substantially as set forth in this part, may continue to do business under that name or designation.

(d) Any person, firm, individual, partnership, trust, domestic corporation, foreign corporation, or association which did business in this state under a name or designation including the word “cooperative” prior to September 19, 1939, but which does not conduct business on a cooperative basis as contemplated by Section 12201 of this part, may continue to do business under that name or designation if the words “not organized under the law relating to cooperative corporations” are always placed immediately after the name or designation wherever it is used.

(e) Any foreign corporation, organized under and complying with the cooperative
 law of the state or other jurisdiction of its creation, may use the term “cooperative” in this state if it has complied with the laws of this state applicable to foreign corporations, insofar as those laws are applicable to it, and if it is doing business on a cooperative basis as contemplated by Section 12201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 28.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12312.

The articles of incorporation may set forth a further statement limiting the purposes or powers of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12313.

(a) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions, which shall not be effective unless expressly provided in the articles:

(1) A provision limiting the duration of the corporation’s existence to a specified date.

(2) A provision providing for the distribution of the remaining assets of the corporation, after payment or adequate provision for all of its debts and liabilities, to a charitable trust.

(b) Nothing contained in subdivision (a) shall affect the enforceability, as between the parties
 thereto, of any lawful agreement not otherwise contrary to public policy.

(c) The articles of incorporation may set forth any or all of the following provisions:

(1) The names and addresses of the persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(2) Provisions concerning the transfer of memberships, in accordance with Section 12410.

(3) The classes of members, if any, and if there are two or more classes, the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, and conditions attaching to each class.

(4) Any other provision, not in conflict with law, for the management of the activities and for the
 conduct of the affairs of the corporation, including any provision which is required or permitted by this part to be stated in the bylaws.

(5) A provision conferring upon members the right to determine the consideration for which memberships shall be issued.

(6) A provision authorizing the board of directors, within any limits or restrictions stated, to fix the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, and conditions attaching to any wholly unissued class of memberships authorized in the bylaws or the articles.

(7) If the bylaws or articles authorize a class of memberships to be divisible into series, a provision authorizing the board of directors,
 within any limits or restrictions stated, to fix the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, and conditions attaching to any wholly unissued series of a membership class authorized to be divisible into series, and to fix the number of memberships in the series and the designation of the series. As to any series, the number of which is authorized to be fixed by the board, the articles may also authorize the board to increase or decrease, but not below the number of memberships then outstanding, the number of memberships of any such series subsequent to the
 issuance of that series. Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, in case the number of memberships of any series is decreased, the memberships constituting this decrease shall resume the status which they had prior to the adoption of the board resolution originally fixing the number of memberships of the series.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 3.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12314.

The articles of incorporation of a central organization, as defined in Section 12256, organized under or subject to this part may provide for unequal voting power of its members based upon the number of its members’ members, the patronage of its members, or both. In no event shall any member have less than one vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

12315.

For all purposes other than an action in the nature of quo warranto, a copy of the articles of a corporation duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the formation of the corporation and prima facie evidence of its corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.

If initial directors have not been named in the articles of incorporation, the incorporators may do whatever is necessary and proper to perfect the organization of the corporation, including the adoption and amendment of bylaws of the corporation and the election of directors and officers, until the directors are elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 792, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

12317.

(a) A worker cooperative may, in its articles or bylaws, establish itself as a capital account cooperative.

(b) The articles or bylaws of a capital account cooperative may authorize assignment of a portion of retained net earnings and net losses to an unallocated capital account. The unallocated capital account in a capital account cooperative shall reflect any paid-in capital and retained net earnings not allocated to individual members. Earnings assigned to the unallocated capital account may be used for any and all corporate purposes, as determined by the board of directors.

(c) The system of member and unallocated capital accounts may be used to determine the redemption price of member shares,
 capital stock, and written notices of allocation. The articles or bylaws may provide for the capital account cooperative worker cooperative to pay or credit interest on the balance in each member’s capital account.

(d) The articles or bylaws of a capital account cooperative may permit the periodic redemption of written notices of allocation and capital stock and shall provide for recall and redemption of membership shares upon termination of membership in the cooperative. However, no redemption may occur that would result in the liability of any director or officer pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 12370) of Chapter 2.

(e) As used in this section, “written notice of allocation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1388 (b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 48.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers [12320. - 12321.]

12320.

Subject to any limitations contained in the articles or bylaws and to compliance with other provisions of this part and any other applicable laws, a corporation, in carrying out its activities, shall have all of the powers of a natural person, including, without limitation, the power to:

(a) Adopt, use, and at will alter a corporate seal, but failure to affix a seal does not affect the validity of any instrument.

(b) Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws.

(c) Qualify to conduct its activities in any other state, territory, dependency, or foreign country.

(d) Issue, purchase, redeem, receive, take or
 otherwise acquire, own, sell, lend, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, pledge, use, and otherwise deal in and with its own memberships, bonds, debentures, notes, and debt securities.

(e) Pay pensions, and establish and carry out pension, deferred compensation, saving, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of its directors, officers, employees, and persons providing services to it or any of its subsidiary or related or associated corporations, and to indemnify and purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any fiduciary of such plans, trusts, or provisions.

(f) Issue certificates evidencing membership in accordance with the provisions of Section 12401 and issue identity cards to identify those persons eligible to use the corporation’s facilities.

(g) Levy dues, assessments, and membership and transfer fees.

(h) Make donations for the public welfare or for community funds, hospital, charitable, educational, scientific, civic, religious, or similar purposes.

(i) Assume obligations, enter into contracts, including contracts of guarantee or suretyship, incur liabilities, borrow or lend money or otherwise use its credit, and secure any of its obligations, contracts, or liabilities by mortgage, pledge, or other encumbrance of all or any part of its property and income.

(j) Participate with others in any partnership, joint venture, or other association, transaction, or arrangement of any kind whether or not such participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others.

(k) Act as trustee under any trust incidental to the principal objects of the corporation, and receive, hold, administer, exchange, and expend funds and property subject to such trust.

(l) Carry on a business at a profit and apply any profit that results from the business activity to any activity in which it may lawfully engage.

(m) (1) In anticipation of or during an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 12331:

(A) Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent resulting from the emergency.

(B) Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

(2) During an emergency, take either or both of the following actions necessary to conduct the corporation’s business operations and affairs, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 12331:

(A) Give notice to a director or directors in any practicable manner under the circumstances, including, but not limited to, by publication and radio, when notice of a meeting of the board cannot be given to that director or directors in the manner prescribed by the bylaws or Section 12351.

(B) Deem that one or more officers of the corporation present at a board meeting is a director, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority,
 as necessary to achieve a quorum for that meeting.

(3) In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(4) Any actions taken in good faith in anticipation of or during an emergency under this subdivision bind the corporation and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “emergency” means any of the following events or circumstances as a result of which, and only so long as, a quorum of the
 corporation’s board of directors cannot be readily convened for action:

(A) A natural catastrophe, including, but not limited to, a hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, epidemic, pandemic, or disease outbreak, or, regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion.

(B) An attack on or within this state or on the public security of its residents by an enemy of this state or on the nation by an enemy of the United States of America, or upon receipt by this state of a warning from the federal government indicating that any such enemy attack is probable or imminent.

(C) An act of terrorism or other manmade disaster that results in extraordinary levels of casualties or damage or disruption severely affecting
 the infrastructure, environment, economy, government functions, or population, including, but not limited to, mass evacuations.

(D) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor of this state, including any person serving as Governor in accordance with Section 10 of Article V of the California Constitution and Section 12058 of the Government Code, or by the President of the United States of America.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 19.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12321.

(a) No limitation upon the activities, purposes, or powers of the corporation or upon the powers of the members, officers, or directors, or the manner of exercise of such powers, contained in or implied by the articles or by Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 12620), 16 (commencing with Section 12630) and 17 (commencing with Section 12650) shall be asserted as between the corporation or member, officer or director and any third person, except in a proceeding: (1) by a member or the state to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized activities by the corporation or its officers, or both, in cases where third parties have not
 acquired rights thereby, (2) to dissolve the corporation, or (3) by the corporation or by a member suing in any representative suit against the officers or directors of the corporation for violation of their authority.

(b) Any contract or conveyance made in the name of a corporation which is authorized or ratified by the board, or is done within the scope of authority, actual or apparent, conferred by the board or within the agency power of the officer executing it, except as the board’s authority is limited by law other than this part, binds the corporation, and the corporation acquires rights thereunder whether the contract is executed or wholly or in part executory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1625, Sec. 3.   Operative January 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Bylaws [12330. - 12333.]

12330.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and Sections 12331, 12360, 12364, 12462, and 12484, bylaws may be adopted, amended, or repealed by the board unless the action would do any of the following:

(1) Materially and adversely affect the rights or obligations of members as to voting, dissolution, redemption, transfer, distributions, patronage distributions, patronage, property rights, or rights to repayment of contributed capital.

(2) Increase or decrease the number or members authorized in total or for any class.

(3) Effect an exchange, reclassification or
 cancellation of all or part of the memberships.

(4) Authorize a new class of membership.

(b) Bylaws may be adopted, amended or repealed by approval of the members (Section 12224); provided, however, that adoption, amendment, or repeal also requires approval by the members of a class or series if that action would do any of the following:

(1) Materially and adversely affect the rights or obligations of that class or series as to voting, dissolution, redemption, transfer, distributions, patronage distributions, patronage, property rights, or rights to repayment of contributed capital, in a manner different than such action affects another class or another series within the same class.

(2) Materially and adversely affect such class or series as to voting, dissolution, redemption, transfer, distributions, patronage distributions, patronage, property rights, or rights to repayment of contributed capital, by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another class or another series within the same class.

(3) Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for the class.

(4) Increase the number of memberships authorized for another
 class.

(5) Effect an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of all or part of the memberships of the class or series.

(6) Authorize a new class of memberships.

(c) The articles or bylaws may restrict or eliminate the power of the board to adopt, amend or repeal any or all bylaws, subject to subdivision (e) of Section 12331.

(d) Bylaws may also provide that repeal or amendment of those bylaws, or the repeal or amendment of specified portions of those bylaws, may occur only with the approval in writing of a specified person or persons other than the board or members. However, this approval requirement, unless the articles or the bylaws specify otherwise,
 shall not apply if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The specified person or persons have died or ceased to exist.

(2) If the right of the specified person or persons to approve is in the capacity of an officer, trustee, or other status and the office, trust, or status has ceased to exist.

(3) If the corporation has a specific proposal for amendment or repeal, and the corporation has provided written notice of that proposal, including a copy of the proposal, to the specified person or persons at the most recent address for each of them, based on the corporation’s records, and the corporation has not received written approval or nonapproval within the period specified in the notice, which shall not be less than
 10 nor more than 30 days commencing at least 20 days after the notice has been provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 538, Sec. 4.   (AB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12331.
